src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VI2-PastSubj		! Past Subjunctive Mood - Modh Foshuit. Caite
+1P+Sg:beirinn	NegQ;
+2P+Sg:beirteá	NegQ;
+2P+Sg+Emph:beirteása	NegQ;
+3P+Sg:beireadh	NegQ;
+1P+Pl:beirimis	NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:beirimisne	NegQ;
+2P+Pl:beireadh	NegQ;
+3P+Pl:beiridís	NegQ;
+Auto:beirtí 	NegQ;		


LEXICON VI2-Imper		! Imperative Mood - Modh Ordaitheach

+1P+Sg:beirim	NegImper;
+2P+Sg:beir	NegImper;
+3P+Sg:beireadh	NegImper;
+1P+Pl:beirimis	NegImper;
+2P+Pl:beirigí	NegImper;
+3P+Pl:beiridís	NegImper;
+Auto:beirtear 	NegImper;


!**************************************************************************


LEXICON VI3	! CLOIS (Irregular)


+PresInd:0	VI3-PresInd;	!*** Modh Táscach - Indicative Mood
+PastInd:0	VI3-PastInd;
+FutInd:0	VI3-FutInd;
+PastImp:0	VI3-PastImp;

+Cond:0		VI3-Cond;	!*** Modh Coinníollach - Condit. Mood

+PresSubj:0	VI3-PresSubj;	!*** Modh Foshuiteach - Subjunctive Mood
!!!!!!!!!+Verb+PastSubj:0	VI3-PastSubj;

+Imper:0	VI3-Imper;	!*** Modh Ordaitheach - Imperative Mood


LEXICON VI3-PresInd		! Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach
0:cloiseann		SufNegQ;
!!0:cloiseanns		NegQ;
+1P+Sg:cloisim		NegQ;
+1P+Sg+Emph:cloisimse		NegQ;
+1P+Pl:cloisimid	NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:cloisimidne	NegQ;
+Auto:cloistear		NegQ; ! +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar
+Rel+Len:chloiseas		#; 

LEXICON VI3-PastInd		! Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite

+Len:chuala		#;		
+2P+Sg+Len:chualaís	#;
+2P+Sg+Emph+Len:chualaís-se	#;
+1P+Pl+Len:chualamar	#;
+1P+Pl+Emph+Len:chualamarna	#;
+3P+Pl+Len:chualadar	#;
+3P+Pl+Len+Emph:chualadarsan	#;
!!! VARIATION WITH ECL 
+Ecl:gcuala		#;		
+2P+Sg+Ecl:gcualaís	#;
+2P+Sg+Emph+Ecl:gcualaís-se	#;
+1P+Pl+Ecl:gcualamar	#;
+1P+Pl+Emph+Ecl:gcualamarna	#;
+3P+Pl+Ecl:gcualadar	#;
+3P+Pl+Ecl+Emph:gcualadarsan	#;

+Auto+Len:chualathas	#;		
+Auto+Ecl:gcualathas	#;		

LEXICON VI3-FutInd		! Future Tense - Aimsir Fháistineach
0:cloisfidh		NegQ;
+1P+Pl:cloisfimid	NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:cloisfimidne	NegQ;
+Auto:cloisfear		NegQ;		
+Rel+Len:chloisfeas		#;		

LEXICON VI3-PastImp		! Imperfect  - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite ( past hab.)
0:cloiseadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:cloisinn	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:cloisteá	NegQ2;
!!!+3P+Sg:cloiseadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:cloisimis	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl+Emph:cloisimisne	NegQ2;
!!!+2P+Pl:cloiseadh	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:cloisidís	NegQ2;
+Auto:cloistí 		NegQ2;		

LEXICON VI3-Cond		! Conditional Mood - Modh Coinníollach

0:cloisfeadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:cloisfinn	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:cloisfeá	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg+Emph:cloisfeása	NegQ2;
!!+3P+Sg:cloisfeadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:cloisfimis	NegQ2;
!!+2P+Pl:cloisfeadh	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:cloisfidís	NegQ2;
+Auto:cloisfí 		NegQ2;		


LEXICON VI3-PresSubj		! Present Subj. Mood - Modh Foshuiteach Láith.
0:cloise		NegSubj;
+1P+Pl:cloisimid	NegSubj;
+1P+Pl+Emph:cloisimidne	NegSubj;
+Auto:cloistear 	NegSubj;		

LEXICON VI3-PastSubj		! Past Subjunctive Mood - Modh Foshuit. Caite
0:cloiseadh NegQ;
+1P+Sg:cloisinn	 NegQ;
+1P+Sg+Emph:cloisinnse	 NegQ;
+2P+Sg:cloisteá	 NegQ;
!!+3P+Sg:cloiseadh NegQ;
+1P+Pl:cloisimis NegQ;
!!+2P+Pl:cloiseadh NegQ;
+3P+Pl:cloisidís NegQ;
+Auto:cloistí    NegQ;		


LEXICON VI3-Imper		! Imperative Mood - Modh Ordaitheach

+1P+Sg:cloisim	 NegImper;
+2P+Sg:clois	 NegImper;
+3P+Sg:cloiseadh NegImper;
+1P+Pl:cloisimis NegImper;
+2P+Pl:cloisigí	 NegImper;
+3P+Pl:cloisidís NegImper;
+Auto:cloistear  NegImper;



!**************************************************************************


LEXICON VI4	! ITH (Irregular)


+PresInd:0	VI4-PresInd;	!*** Modh Táscach - Indicative Mood
+PastInd:0	VI4-PastInd;
+FutInd:0	VI4-FutInd;
+PastImp:0	VI4-PastImp;

+Cond:0		VI4-Cond;	!*** Modh Coinníollach - Condit. Mood

+PresSubj:0	VI4-PresSubj;	!*** Modh Foshuiteach - Subjunctive Mood
!!!!!!!!+Verb+PastSubj:0	VI4-PastSubj;

+Imper:0	VI4-Imper;	!*** Modh Ordaitheach - Imperative Mood


LEXICON VI4-PresInd		! Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach
0:itheann	SufNegQ;
!!0:itheanns	NegQ;
+1P+Sg:ithim	NegQ;
+1P+Sg+Emph:ithimse	NegQ;
+1P+Pl:ithimid	NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:ithimidne	NegQ;
+Auto:itear	NegQ;	! +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar
+Rel:itheas	#;	

LEXICON VI4-PastInd		! Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite

0:ith		NegQ2;	!	
+1P+Sg:itheas	NegQ2;	!
+1P+Sg+Emph:itheas-sa	NegQ2;	!
+2P+Sg:ithis	NegQ2;	!
+1P+Pl:itheamar	NegQ2;	!
+1P+Pl+Emph:itheamarna	NegQ2;	!
+3P+Pl:itheadar	NegQ2;	!
+3P+Pl+Emph:itheadarsan	NegQ2;	!
+Auto:itheadh		NegQ2;		!XXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXX

LEXICON VI4-FutInd		! Future Tense - Aimsir Fháistineach
0:íosfaidh		NegQ;
+1P+Pl:íosfaimid	NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:íosfaimidne	NegQ;
+Auto:íosfar		NegQ;		
+Rel:íosfas		#;		

LEXICON VI4-PastImp		! Imperfect  - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite ( past hab.)
0:itheadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:ithinn		NegQ2; ! inserted 2 21/3/05 ????
+2P+Sg:iteá		NegQ2;
!!!!+3P+Sg:itheadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:ithimis	NegQ2;
!!!!+2P+Pl:itheadh	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:ithidís	NegQ2;
+Auto:ití 		NegQ2;		

LEXICON VI4-Cond		! Conditional Mood - Modh Coinníollach

0:íosfadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:íosfainn	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:íosfá		NegQ2;
+2P+Sg+Emph:íosfása		NegQ2;
!!!!!+3P+Sg:íosfadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:íosfaimis	NegQ2;
!!!!!+2P+Pl:íosfadh	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:íosfaidís	NegQ2;
+Auto:íosfaí 		NegQ2;		


LEXICON VI4-PresSubj		! Present Subj. Mood - Modh Foshuiteach Láith.
0:ithe		NegSubj;
+1P+Pl:ithimid	NegSubj;
+1P+Pl+Emph:ithimidne	NegSubj;
+Auto:itear 	NegSubj;		

LEXICON VI4-PastSubj		! Past Subjunctive Mood - Modh Foshuit. Caite
+1P+Sg:ithinn	NegQ;
+2P+Sg:iteá	NegQ;
+3P+Sg:itheadh	NegQ;
+1P+Pl:ithimis	NegQ;
+2P+Pl:itheadh	NegQ;
+3P+Pl:ithidís	NegQ;
+Auto:ití	NegQ;		



LEXICON VI4-Imper		! Imperative Mood - Modh Ordaitheach

+1P+Sg:ithim	 NegImper;
+2P+Sg:ith	 NegImper;
+3P+Sg:itheadh NegImper;
+1P+Pl:ithimis NegImper;
+2P+Pl:ithigí	 NegImper;
+3P+Pl:ithidís NegImper;
+Auto:itear  NegImper;



!**************************************************************************


LEXICON VI5	! TABHAIR (Irregular)


+PresInd:0	VI5-PresInd;	!*** Modh Táscach - Indicative Mood
+PastInd:0	VI5-PastInd;
+FutInd:0	VI5-FutInd;
+PastImp:0	VI5-PastImp;

+Cond:0		VI5-Cond;	!*** Modh Coinníollach - Condit. Mood

+PresSubj:0	VI5-PresSubj;	!*** Modh Foshuiteach - Subjunctive Mood
!!!!!+Verb+PastSubj:0	VI5-PastSubj;

+Imper:0	VI5-Imper;	!*** Modh Ordaitheach - Imperative Mood


LEXICON VI5-PresInd		! Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach
0:tugann	SufNegQ;
!!0:tuganns	NegQ;
+1P+Sg:tugaim	NegQ;
+1P+Sg+Emph:tugaimse	NegQ;
+1P+Pl:tugaimid	NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:tugaimidne	NegQ;
+Auto:tugtar	NegQ; ! +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar
+Rel+Len:thugas	#;

LEXICON VI5-PastInd		! Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite

0:tug		NegQ2;		
+1P+Sg:tugas	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg+Emph:tugas-sa	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:tugais	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:tugamar	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl+Emph:tugamarna	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:tugadar	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl+Emph:tugadarsan	NegQ2;
+Auto:tugadh	NegQIrreg;		!! auto does not lenite

LEXICON VI5-FutInd		! Future Tense - Aimsir Fháistineach
0:tabharfaidh		NegQ;
+1P+Pl:tabharfaimid	NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:tabharfaimidne	NegQ;
+Auto:tabharfar		NegQ;		
+Rel+Len:thabharfas		#;		

LEXICON VI5-PastImp		! Imperfect  - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite ( past hab.)
0:tugadh		NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:tugainn		NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:tugtá		NegQ2;
!!!+3P+Sg:tugadh		NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:tugaimis	NegQ2;
!!!+2P+Pl:tugadh		NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:tugaidís	NegQ2;
+Auto:tugtaí 		NegQ2;		

LEXICON VI5-Cond		! Conditional Mood - Modh Coinníollach

0:tabharfadh		NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:tabharfainn		NegQ2;
+1P+Sg+Emph:tabharfainnse		NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:tabharfá		NegQ2;
+2P+Sg+Emph:tabharfása		NegQ2;
!!!+3P+Sg:tabharfadh		NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:tabharfaimis	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl+Emph:tabharfaimisne	NegQ2;
!!!+2P+Pl:tabharfadh		NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:tabharfaidís	NegQ2;
+Auto:tabharfaí		NegQ2;		


LEXICON VI5-PresSubj		! Present Subj. Mood - Modh Foshuiteach Láith.
0:tuga		NegQ;
+1P+Pl:tugaimid	NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:tugaimidne	NegQ;
+Auto:tugtar 	NegQ;		

LEXICON VI5-PastSubj		! Past Subjunctive Mood - Modh Foshuit. Caite
+1P+Sg:tugainn	NegQ;
+2P+Sg:tugtá	NegQ;
+3P+Sg:tugadh 	NegQ;
+1P+Pl:tugaimis	NegQ;
+2P+Pl:tugadh	NegQ;
+3P+Pl:tugaidís NegQ;
+Auto:tugtaí    NegQ;		
